South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S996.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 63-13-190(A)(2) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A)(2) A volunteer or an employee of a contractor or subcontractor who contracts with the Department of Social Services for the delivery of protective services, family preservation services, foster care services, family reunification services, adoption services, and other related services or programs or a person child welfare services and who has direct unsupervised contact with a child in the custody of the Department of Social Services shall undergo a state fingerprint-based background check to be conducted by the State Law Enforcement Division to determine any state criminal history and a fingerprint-based background check to be conducted by the Federal Bureau of Investigation to determine any other criminal history.  No person may be employed by a contractor or a subcontractor, act in a volunteer capacity, or have access to a child in the custody of the department if the person has been convicted of or pled guilty or nolo contendere to any crime listed in Section 63-13-40(A). SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----